North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.2 Sales Tax
57-39.2-04.3.
Sales tax exemption for manufacturing or recycling machinery and equipment and primary sector business computer and telecommunications equipment.

Gross receipts from sales of machinery or equipment used directly in manufacturing of tangible personal property for wholesale, retail, or lease are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the machinery or equipment must be used in a new manufacturing plant or in a physical or economic expansion of an existing manufacturing plant. Purchase of replacement machinery or equipment is not exempt unless it results in a physical or economic expansion of the plant.

Gross receipts from sales of machinery or equipment used directly in recycling of tangible personal property are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the machinery or equipment must be used in a new recycling facility or in physical or economic expansion of an existing recycling facility. Purchase of replacement machinery or equipment is not exempt unless it results in a physical or economic expansion of the facility.

Gross receipts from sales of computer and telecommunications equipment that is an integral part of a new primary sector business or a physical or economic expansion of a primary sector business are exempt from taxes under this chapter. Purchase of replacement equipment is not exempt under this subsection.

To qualify for exemption at the time of purchase, the customer, manufacturer, recycler, or primary sector business must receive from the commissioner a certificate stating that the machinery or equipment qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received before the purchase, the customer, manufacturer, recycler, or primary sector business must pay the tax and apply to the commissioner for a refund.

If the machinery or equipment is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to tax under this chapter, the manufacturer, recycler, or primary sector business must apply for a refund of the amount remitted by the contractor.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Economic expansion” means an increase in production volume, employment, or the types of products that can be manufactured or recycled.

“Equipment”:

For purposes of a customer, means a mold purchased by a customer and used directly by a manufacturer in the manufacturing process;

For purposes of a manufacturer or recycler, means any tangible personal property other than machinery used directly in the manufacturing or recycling process; and

For purposes of a primary sector business other than manufacturing or recycling, means telecommunications equipment and computer equipment, printers, and software that are an integral part of the operations of the primary sector business.

“Machinery” means mechanical devices purchased or constructed by the manufacturer or recycler, or its agent, and used directly in manufacturing or recycling operations at any time from the initial stage where the raw material is first received at the plant site through the completion of the product, including packaging and all processes prior to transportation of the product from the site. The term includes electrical, mechanical, and electronic components that are part of machinery and necessary for a machine to produce its effect or result and environmental control equipment required to maintain certain levels of humidity or temperature in a special and limited area of the manufacturing facility where the regulation is essential for production to occur. The term includes computer equipment that controls or monitors the functions of machinery used directly in the manufacturing operations.

“Machinery” and “equipment”:

For purposes of a manufacturer or recycler, do not include handtools, buildings, or transportation equipment not used directly in manufacturing or recycling; machines and equipment used primarily in administrative, accounting, sales, or other nonmanufacturing segments of the business; any property that becomes a part of the manufactured or recycled product; or any other equipment or machinery not used directly in manufacturing or recycling; and

For purposes of a primary sector business other than manufacturing or recycling, do not include equipment that is not an integral part of the operations of the primary sector business.

“Manufacturing”, in addition to the meaning ordinarily ascribed to it, means the processing of agricultural products, including registered and certified seed, but does not include mining, refining, extracting oil and gas, or the generation of electricity.

“Primarily” means more than fifty percent of the time the machinery or equipment is used.

“Primary sector business” has the meaning provided in section 1-01-49.

“Recycling” means collecting or recovering material that would otherwise be solid waste and performing all or part of the process in which the material becomes a raw material for manufacturing or becomes a product for sale at retail or wholesale.

“Used directly” with respect to manufacturing means used primarily in the actual production, processing, fabrication, or assembly of raw materials, or partially finished materials, into the form in which the product is finalized, packaged, and ready for market. The term also means:

To effect a direct physical change upon the tangible personal property.

To guide or measure a direct physical change upon the property when the function is an integral and essential part of tuning, verifying, or aligning the component parts of the tangible personal property.

To test or measure the property on the production line or at a site in the location of production.

To transport, convey, or handle the tangible personal property during the manufacturing.

To package the product for sale and shipment.

To conduct research and development and design activities related to the manufacturing process of the plant.

“Used directly” with respect to recycling means used solely in processing, compacting, altering, transporting, or otherwise affecting material as a part of the recycling process.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 680, § 1; 1993, ch. 565, § 1; 1993, ch. 566, § 1; 1994 Sp., ch. 784, §§ 4, 5; 1995, ch. 572, § 1; 1999, ch. 519, § 1; 2001, ch. 539, § 1; 2015, ch. 454, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 56, § 10, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2017.

57-39.2-04.4.
Sales tax exemption for materials used to construct agricultural commodity processing facility.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct an agricultural commodity processing facility in this state are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the tangible personal property must be incorporated in the structure of the facility or used in the construction process to the point of having no residual economic value.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the owner of the facility must receive from the commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct an agricultural commodity processing facility which the owner intends to purchase qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received prior to the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Agricultural commodity processing facility” means buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements used or operated primarily for the processing or production of marketable products from agricultural commodities. The term does not include a facility that provides only storage, cleaning, drying, or transportation of agricultural commodities.

“Facility” means each part of the facility which is used in a process primarily for the processing of agricultural commodities, including receiving or storing agricultural commodities; transporting the agricultural commodities or product before, during, or after the processing; or packaging or otherwise preparing the product for sale or shipment.

“Tangible personal property” does not include tools or machinery used to construct an agricultural commodity processing facility and does not include machinery or equipment exempted under section 57-39.2-04.3.

Source:

1994 Sp., ch. 784, § 6; 2007, ch. 516, § 3.

57-39.2-04.5.
Sales and use tax exemption for materials used in compressing, processing, gathering, collecting, or refining of gas.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct or expand a system used to compress, process, gather, collect, or refine gas recovered from an oil or gas well in this state or used to expand or build a gas processing facility in this state are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the tangible personal property must be incorporated into a system used to compress, process, gather, collect, or refine gas. Tangible personal property used to replace an existing system to compress, process, gather, collect, or refine gas does not qualify for exemption under this section unless the replacement creates an expansion of the system.

To receive the exemption under this section at the time of purchase, the owner of the gas compressing, processing, gathering, collecting, or refining system must receive from the tax commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct or expand a system used to compress, process, gather, collect, or refine gas recovered from an oil or gas well in this state or used to expand or build a gas processing facility in this state which the owner intends to purchase qualifies for exemption. If a certificate is not received before the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the tax commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner of the gas compressing, processing, gathering, collecting, or refining system may apply to the tax commissioner for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section. Application for a refund must be made at the times and in the manner directed by the tax commissioner and must include sufficient information to permit the tax commissioner to verify the sales and use taxes paid and the exempt status of the sale or use.

For purposes of this section, a gas collecting system means a collection system described in subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 38-08-06.4.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 2; 2009, ch. 565, § 1; 2011, ch. 469, § 1; 2013, ch. 472, § 2.

57-39.2-04.6.
Sales and use tax exemption for materials used in construction or expansion of an oil refinery.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used in expanding or constructing an oil refinery that has a nameplate capacity of processing at least five thousand barrels of oil per day in this state are exempt from taxes under this chapter.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the owner of the oil refinery must receive from the tax commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct or expand an oil refinery qualifying under this section which the owner intends to purchase qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received before the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the tax commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner of the oil refinery may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed under this section. Application for a refund must be made at the times and in the manner directed by the tax commissioner and must include sufficient information to permit the tax commissioner to verify the sales and use taxes paid and the exempt status of the sale or use.

This chapter and chapter 57-40.2 apply to the exemption under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 3; 2011, ch. 469, § 2.

57-39.2-04.7.
Sales tax exemption for equipment used in telecommunications infrastructure development. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2011, ch. 470, § 1.

57-39.2-04.8.
Sales tax exemption for machinery or equipment used to produce coal from a new mine.

Gross receipts from sales of machinery or equipment used to produce coal from a new mine located in this state are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter. The exemption for each new mine under this section is limited to the first five million dollars of sales and use tax paid.

Purchase of replacement machinery or equipment is exempt if the capitalized investment in the new mine exceeds twenty million dollars using the United States generally accepted accounting principles. Purchases of repair or replacement parts for existing machinery or equipment are not exempt under this section.

The mine operator shall apply to the commissioner for a refund of sales and use taxes paid for which the exemption is claimed under this section. A refund claim may not exceed the limitation in subsection 1. If the machinery or equipment is used directly or indirectly to produce coal, the interest provisions of section 57-39.2-25 do not apply to purchases made before July 1, 2015. Application for the refund must be made at the time and in the manner directed by the commissioner and must include sufficient information to verify the correctness of the refund claim.

For purposes of this section:

“Machinery or equipment” means machinery or equipment purchased after December 31, 2010, and used directly or indirectly to uncover, sever, crush, handle, or transport coal removed from the earth. “Machinery or equipment” includes draglines, excavators, rolling stock, conveyor equipment, reclamation equipment, equipment to pulverize coal, water trucks, fuel trucks, low-boys, cranes, lubrication trucks, motor graders, service trucks, light plants, and dewatering equipment, but does not include rail spurs, office buildings, workshops, or any component not used directly to uncover, sever, crush, handle, or transport coal removed from the earth.

“New mine” means an area permitted under chapter 38-14.1 by the public service commission after December 31, 2010.

“Produce coal” means mining operations to uncover, sever, crush, handle, or transport coal from its natural location under the earth’s surface to the mouth of the mine and all activities necessary and incidental to the reclamation of that location.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 471, § 1; 2013, ch. 443, § 32; 2015, ch. 438, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

57-39.2-04.9.
Sales tax exemption for equipment used in telecommunications infrastructure development. [Expired]

Source:

Expired by S.L. 2013, ch. 457, § 5.

57-39.2-04.10.
Sales tax exemption for materials used to construct a processing facility to produce liquefied natural gas.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct or expand a processing facility in this state to produce liquefied natural gas are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the tangible personal property must be incorporated in the structure of the facility or used in the construction process to the point of having no residual economic value.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the owner of the processing facility must receive from the commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct the processing facility which the owner intends to purchase qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received prior to the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 459, § 2.

57-39.2-04.11.
Sales tax exemption for materials used to construct a facility for coal gasification byproducts.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct or expand a facility in this state to extract or process byproducts associated with coal gasification are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the tangible personal property must be incorporated in the structure of the facility or used in the construction process to the point of having no residual economic value.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the owner of the facility must receive from the commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct the processing facility which the owner intends to purchase qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received prior to the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section.

For purposes of this section, “coal gasification” and “byproducts” have the same meaning as defined in chapter 57-60.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 461, § 1.

57-39.2-04.12.
Sales tax rebate for certain purchases of replacement property for property damaged or destroyed by 2011 flooding. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2013, ch. 462, §
2.

57-39.2-04.14.
Sales and use tax exemption for materials used in compressing, gathering, collecting, storing, transporting, or injecting carbon dioxide for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct or expand a system used to compress, gather, collect, store, transport, or inject carbon dioxide for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas in this state are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the tangible personal property must be incorporated into a system used to compress, gather, collect, store, transport, or inject carbon dioxide for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas. Tangible personal property used to replace an existing system to compress, gather, collect, store, transport, or inject carbon dioxide for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas does not qualify for exemption under this section unless the replacement creates an expansion of the system.

To receive the exemption under this section at the time of purchase, the owner of the gas compressing, gathering, collecting, storing, transporting, or injecting system must receive from the tax commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct or expand a system used to compress, gather, collect, store, transport, or inject carbon dioxide for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received before the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the tax commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner of the gas compressing, gathering, collecting, storing, transporting, or injecting system may apply to the tax commissioner for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section. Application for a refund must be made at the time and in the manner directed by the tax commissioner and must include sufficient information to permit the tax commissioner to verify the sales and use taxes paid and the exempt status of the sale or use.

This chapter and chapter 57-40.2 apply to the exemption under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 458, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 478, § 2, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019.

57-39.2-04.15.
Sales and use tax exemption for materials used to construct a fertilizer or chemical processing facility.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct a fertilizer or chemical processing facility in this state, and any component integral to the fertilizer or chemical processing plant, are exempt from taxes under this chapter. To be exempt, the tangible personal property must be incorporated in the structure of the facility or used in the construction process to the point of having no residual economic value. The exemption provided in this section applies to all phases of construction under the permit or application for permit required by subsection 2. An integral component to the fertilizer or chemical processing plant:

May be owned directly or indirectly by the fertilizer or chemical processing facility, or by an unrelated third party;

Must be located at the facility site; and

Must be necessary for the plant’s processing of fertilizer or chemicals.

On or before June 30, 2023, the owner of the fertilizer or chemical processing plant must receive from the department of environmental quality an air quality permit or a notice that the air quality permit application is complete. The owner shall provide this documentation to the tax commissioner to qualify for the exemption under this section. Denial, expiration, or revocation of a permit terminates the exemption under this section.

To receive the exemption under this section at the time of purchase, the owner of the processing facility must receive from the tax commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct the processing facility which the owner intends to purchase qualifies for exemption. If a certificate is not received before the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the tax commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section. Application for refund must be made at the times and in the manner directed by the tax commissioner and must include sufficient information to permit the tax commissioner to verify the sales and use taxes paid and the exempt status of the sale or use.

For purposes of this section, a fertilizer or chemical processing facility means a processing plant that produces for retail or wholesale a fertilizer, chemical, or chemical derivative from natural gas, natural gas liquids, or crude oil components.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 457, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2019, ch. 498, § 1, eff for taxable periods beginning after June 30, 2019.

57-39.2-04.16.
Sales tax exemption for materials used to construct a qualified straddle plant, a qualified fractionator, or qualified associated infrastructure.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property used to construct or expand a qualified straddle plant, a qualified fractionator, or qualified associated infrastructure in this state are exempt from the tax imposed under this chapter. To qualify for the exemption, the tangible personal property must be incorporated into a qualifying straddle plant or a qualifying fractionator plant, or used in the construction process to the point of having no residual economic value. Replacement of tangible personal property does not qualify for the exemption under this section unless the replacement creates an expansion of the plant or qualified associated infrastructure.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the owner of the plant or qualified associated infrastructure must receive from the tax commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property used to construct the plant qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received prior to the purchase, the owner shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the tax commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the owner may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption allowed by this section. Application for a refund must be made at the time and in the manner directed by the tax commissioner, and must include sufficient information to permit the tax commissioner to verify the sales and use taxes paid and the exempt status of the sale or use.

For purposes of this section:

“Deep cut fractionator” means a plant that processes a mixed natural gas liquids stream into purity natural gas liquids, including ethane, propane, butane, and C-five plus.

“Expansion” means an increase in production volume, employment, or the type of products produced.

“Qualified associated infrastructure” means:

Natural gas liquid pipelines built to supply mixed natural gas liquids to the qualified fractionator;

Storage facilities for mixed natural gas liquids that will be processed by the qualified fractionator;

Storage facilities for purity natural gas liquids, including ethane, propane, butane, and C-five plus, that are produced by the qualified fractionator;

Disposal facilities built for the qualified fractionator and for onsite purchasers of the fractionator’s processed end-product;

Rail upgrades required for the qualified fractionator and onsite purchasers to access rail transportation; and

Roads developed for the qualified fractionator, storage facilities, and onsite customers.

“Qualified fractionator” means a deep cut fractionator located in this state with a daily design capacity of at least forty-five thousand barrels of ethane, fifteen thousand barrels of propane, thirteen thousand barrels of butane, and three thousand barrels of C-five plus.

“Qualified straddle plant” means a straddle plant located in this state that is either connected to a qualified fractionator or produces Y-grade liquids that are dedicated for use by a qualified fractionator.

“Straddle plant” means a gas processing plant located on or near a gas transmission line, which removes residual natural gas liquids from the gas stream and returns the residue gas to the transmission line.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 498, § 3, eff for taxable periods beginning after June 30, 2019.

57-39.2-04.17.
Sales and use tax exemption for enterprise information technology equipment and computer software used in a qualified data center. (Retroactive application — See note)

The future owner of a proposed data center shall apply to the tax commissioner to be certified as a qualified data center. An applicant shall respond to a request for additional information from the tax commissioner within thirty days of the request or the application may no longer be considered.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a portion of sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections, equal to one-fourth of one percent of an amount determined by multiplying the quotient of one percent divided by the general sales tax rate, that was in effect when the taxes were collected, times the net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections under chapters 57-39.2, 57-39.5, 57-39.6, 57-40.2, and 57-40.3 must be deposited by the state treasurer in the county aid distribution fund. The tax commissioner shall certify to the state treasurer the portion of sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax net revenues that must be deposited in the county aid distribution fund as determined under this subsection.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the qualified business shall obtain from the tax commissioner a certificate that the enterprise information technology equipment or computer software the qualified business intends to purchase qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received before the purchase, the qualified business shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the tax commissioner for a refund.

If the enterprise information technology equipment is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the qualified business may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section. Application for a refund must be made at the times and in the manner directed by the tax commissioner and must include sufficient information to permit the tax commissioner to verify the sales and use taxes paid and the exempt status of the sale or use.

For purposes of this section:

“Computer software” includes software used or loaded at a qualified data center, software maintenance, software licensing, and software customization.

“Data center” means a centralized repository for the storage, management, and dissemination of electronic data and information organized around a particular body or bodies of knowledge.

“Enterprise information technology equipment” includes:

“Qualified business” means the owner, operator, or tenants of a qualified data center.

“Qualified data center” means a newly constructed or substantially refurbished facility located in this state:

“Substantially refurbished” means a data center used to house enterprise information technology equipment in which fifteen thousand square feet [1394 square meters] or more has been rebuilt, modified, or improved through methods including energy efficiency improvements, building improvements, and the installation of enterprise information technology equipment, environmental controls, and computer software.

In determining the total square footage of a qualified data center, the square footage of office space, meeting space, mechanical space, and other support facility spaces must be included if those spaces are used to support the operation of enterprise information technology equipment.

Qualified data center owners that intend to collocate operators or tenants within the center shall provide the operators or tenants with documentation from the tax commissioner that the center meets the definition of a qualified data center under this section. Operators or tenants shall obtain and submit a copy of the documentation with all applications for sales tax exemption on information technology equipment and computer software purchased for use in the qualified data center.

By January thirty-first of each year, a qualified data center owner shall file with the tax commissioner, on forms and in the manner prescribed by the tax commissioner, a report showing for the previous calendar year:

1.

Computer hardware, servers, routers, cooling systems, and cooling towers.

2.

Temperature control infrastructure and power infrastructure used for transformation, distribution, or management of electricity used for the maintenance and operation of a qualified data center.

3.

Exterior dedicated business-owned substations, backup power generation systems, battery systems, or other related infrastructure.

4.

Racking systems, raised flooring, cabling, or trays necessary for the maintenance and operation of a qualified data center.

1.

Comprised of one or more buildings, the primary purpose of which is to contain a data center, consisting of an aggregate amount of fifteen thousand square feet [1394 square meters] or more, no fewer than fifty percent of which is used for data processing;

2.

Located on a single parcel or on contiguous parcels;

3.

On which construction is completed or which is substantially refurbished after December 31, 2020;

4.

Having the following attributes:

Sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and

Enhanced security with security features including video camera surveillance; an electronic system requiring pass codes, key cards, or biometric scans such as hand scans or retinal or fingerprint recognition to restrict access to selected personnel; or other similar security features; and

The type and value of any local incentives provided to the qualified data center.

5.

Certified by the tax commissioner as a qualified data center.

(a)

The amount of the exemption claimed under this section;

(b)

The number of jobs created or retained by the qualified data center; and

9

Upon receipt of a written request from the chairman of the legislative management or the chairman of a standing committee of the legislative assembly, the tax commissioner shall disclose any information described under subsection 8. This subsection does not authorize disclosure of the qualified data center owner's name, social security number, federal employer identification number, address, or any other information prohibited from disclosure under chapter 57-38.

Source:

S.L. 2021, sb2137, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 476, S.L. 2021, provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections received by the tax commissioner after June 30, 2021.”

57-39.2-05.
Credit or refund for taxes paid on worthless accounts and repossessions.

Taxes paid on gross receipts represented by accounts found to be worthless and actually charged off for income tax purposes may be credited upon subsequent payment of the tax herein provided; provided, that if such accounts are hereafter collected by the retailer, a tax must be paid upon the amount so collected. If a retailer’s filing responsibility has been assumed by a certified service provider, the certified provider may claim on behalf of the retailer any bad debt allowance provided under this section. The certified service provider shall credit or refund to the retailer the full amount of any bad debt allowance or refund received under this section.

If a retailer has remitted the sales tax due on the full amount of an installment sales contract rather than on only the installment payments received, the retailer may deduct as a credit against the retailer’s sales tax liability on the next return that the retailer is required to file the amount of sales tax the retailer paid on the installment contract payments which were not made by the purchaser of the merchandise sold under such contract; such credit may be deducted by the retailer regardless of whether or not said retailer has assigned the contract, provided, however, that if the retailer has assigned the contract the retailer must have assigned it subject to an agreement to repurchase the contract in the event of default by the purchaser under the contract or subject to a guarantee that the payments under the contract would be made. In the event such deduction exceeds the amount of sales tax due the state by the retailer in the next regular return, such excess must be allowed as credit against future sales tax due from the retailer. If in any case the credit, or any part of it, cannot be utilized by the retailer because of a discontinuance of a business or for other valid reasons, the amount thereof may be refunded to the retailer.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 5; 2003, ch. 539, § 12; 2005, ch. 582, § 2.

Collateral References.

Interest on tax refund or credit in absence of specific controlling statute, 88 A.L.R.2d 823.

Recovery of Sales Taxes Paid on Bad Debts. 38 A.L.R.6th 255.

57-39.2-06.
Credit to relief agency and local governmental units.

A relief agency may apply to the commissioner for refund of the amount of tax imposed under this chapter and paid upon sales to it of any goods, wares, or merchandise used for free distribution to the poor and needy. Such refunds may be obtained only in the following amount and in the manner and only under all of the following conditions:

On forms furnished by the commissioner, and during the time herein provided for the filing of quarterly tax returns by retailers, the relief agency shall report to the commissioner the total amount or amounts, valued in money, expended directly or indirectly for goods, wares, or merchandise used for free distribution to the poor and needy.

On these forms the relief agency shall separately list the persons making the sales to it or to its order, together with the dates of the sales, and the total amount so expended by the relief agency.

The relief agency must prove to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the person making the sales has included the amount thereof in the computation of the gross receipts of such person and that such person has paid the tax levied by this chapter, based upon such computation of gross receipts.

If the commissioner is satisfied that the foregoing conditions and requirements have been complied with, the commissioner shall refund the amount claimed by the relief agency.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 6.

57-39.2-07.
Sales tax to be added to purchase price and be a debt. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-39.2-08.
Separate and additional tax on retail sales to be added to purchase price and be a debt. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-39.2-08.1.
Separate and additional tax on retail sales to be added to purchase price and be a debt. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.